Utah statutes.
62A-3-311.   Requests for records.

(1)  Requests for records maintained by Adult Protective Services shall be made in writing to Adult Protective Services. 

(2)  Classification and disclosure of records shall be made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act.

